Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 5. Property Allowance for
SurvivingSpouse and Minor
Children

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For case note, “Trusts & Estates—Spousal Disinheritance—Inter vivos Trusts and Wyoming's Spousal Elective Share. Briggs v. Wyoming Nat'l Bank, 836 P.2d 263,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 323 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 677-723.

34 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 344 to 532.

§ 2-7-501.
Right to homestead and support; “homestead” defined.

When a person dies leaving a spouse or minor children, the spouse or minor children are entitled to remain in possession of the homestead, all wearing apparel of the family, and all household furniture of the decedent until letters are granted and the inventory is returned. The widow or minor children are also entitled to a reasonable provision for their support, to be allowed by the court.

When any person dies seized of a homestead, leaving a spouse or minor children, the spouse or minor children are entitled to the homestead. If there is neither spouse nor minor children the homestead is liable for the debts of the decedent.

“Homestead” includes that property referred to in W.S.

2-7-507

to the extent in value stated in W.S.

2-7-508

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4733; C.S. 1910, § 5602; Laws 1919, ch. 20, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6876; R.S. 1931, § 88-2901; C.S. 1945, § 6-1501; W.S. 1957, § 2-210; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to absolute property of surviving spouse and minor children, see §

2-7-504

and notes thereto.

Weight of California decisions. —

Since this section and §

2-7-503

were taken from California statutes, the Wyoming supreme court is inclined to adopt construction of those statutes by courts of that state. In re Estate of Dixon, 73 Wyo. 236, 278 P.2d 258,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 19

, 50 A.L.R.2d 1240 (1954). See also notes to §

2-1-102

.

Widow's interest held consistent with her right to possessionas executrix. —

Widow, sole devisee and executrix of husband's estate, maintaining an action individually in ejectment involving title and right to possession of lands she claimed as homestead, had interest therein consistent with present rights to possession in her representative capacity. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Allowance temporary and expires with return of inventory. —

Allowance made under this section and §

2-7-503

is temporary, awaiting time when inventory is returned, so that court may thereafter act with better understanding; and order made before return of inventory expires with that return, notwithstanding fact that it recites that it shall be in effect until further order of court. In re Estate of Dixon, 73 Wyo. 236, 278 P.2d 258,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1954).

But executor may make support payments after inventory withoutorder. —

An executor has the right to make payments to his decedent's widow for her support without an order of the court after the return of the inventory, and the only question is as to whether the amount paid by him is reasonable. That question is largely in the discretion of the trial court. In re Estate of Dixon, 73 Wyo. 236, 278 P.2d 258,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1954).

Duration of allowance after inventory and interest on over-payments.—

Where a widow's allowance made under this section was continued after inventory without order of court, it was held that the court should have made her an allowance from the date of death to the time when the executor reported the sale of certain property of the estate and that he had paid a portion of the proceeds to the widow and asked that the widow's allowance be discontinued. Payments made after such objection by the executor were made by mistake, and the widow was not chargeable with interest thereon until discovery of the mistake, that is, until a court determined by final decree what was a reasonable allowance. In re Estate of Dixon, 73 Wyo. 236, 278 P.2d 258,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1954).

Allowance deemed deductible in figuring inheritance tax. —

Family allowance, paid during administration, is a proper deduction from amount on which state inheritance tax is to be computed, since, under this section and §§

2-7-502

and

2-7-503

, it does not pass to widow by will or intestate laws, but is allowed as a matter of public policy. In re Young's Estate, 33 Wyo. 317, 239 P. 286,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1925).

Cited

in

Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1902); In re Austin's Estate, 37 Wyo. 313, 261 P. 130,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(1927); Kelly v. Kilts, 2010 WY 151, 243 P.3d 947,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Nov. 23, 2010).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Allowance in state of decedent's domicile for widow's or children's support as enforceable against decedent's real estate, or proceeds thereof, in another state, 13 ALR2d 973.

Separation agreement as affecting rights to statutory allowance, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

Extrajudicial separation as affecting surviving spouse's right to widow's allowance, 34 ALR2d 1056.

Right of nonresident surviving spouse or minor children to allowance of property exempt from administration or to family allowance from local estate of nonresident decedent, 51 ALR2d 1026.

Who is included in term “family” or “household” in statutes relating to family allowance or exemption out of decedent's estate, 88 ALR2d 890.

Amount of allowance from decedent's estate for widow and family where not fixed by statute, 90 ALR2d 687.

Effect of testamentary gift on widow's right to fixed statutory allowance or allowance for support, 97 ALR2d 1319.

Statutory family allowance to minor children as affected by previous agreement or judgment for their support, 6 ALR3d 1387.

Waiver of right to widow's allowance by postnuptial agreement, 9 ALR3d 955.

Eligibility of illegitimate child to receive family allowance out of estate of his deceased father, 12 ALR3d 1140.

§ 2-7-502.
Extra allowance for maintenance of family.

If the amount set apart is insufficient for the support of the widow and children, or either, the court shall make such reasonable allowance out of the estate as is necessary for the maintenance of the family according to their circumstances during the settlement of the estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4734; C.S. 1910, § 5603; C.S. 1920, § 6877; R.S. 1931, § 88-2902; C.S. 1945, § 6-1502; W.S. 1957, § 2-211; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right to homestead, etc., and support, see §

2-7-501

and notes thereto.

As to absolute property of surviving spouse and minor children, see §

2-7-504

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

In re Young's Estate, 33 Wyo. 317, 239 P. 286,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(1925).

§ 2-7-503.
Preference and payment of allowances; exceptions.

Allowances made shall be paid in preference to all other charges except funeral expenses and cost of administration. Any such allowance, whenever made, may in the discretion of the court take effect from the death of the decedent. This section shall not be construed so as to invalidate any mortgage or lien of record against decedent’s property.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4735; C.S. 1910, § 5604; C.S. 1920, § 6878; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 132; R.S. 1931, § 88-2903; C.S. 1945, § 6-1503; W.S. 1957, § 2-212; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to right to homestead, etc., and support, see §

2-7-501

and notes thereto.

As to absolute property of surviving spouse and minor children, see §

2-7-504

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

In re Young's Estate, 33 Wyo. 317, 239 P. 286,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(1925); Dobler v. Clark, 42 Wyo. 160, 292 P. 246,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(1930); In re Estate of Dixon, 73 Wyo. 236, 278 P.2d 258,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 19

, 50 A.L.R.2d 1240 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coexecutor's or coadministrator's liability for defaults or wrongful acts of fiduciary in handling estate, 65 ALR2d 1019.

Right of coexecutor to retain independent legal counsel, 66 ALR2d 1169.

§ 2-7-504.
Absolute property of surviving spouse and minor children; exceptions; renouncement of will of no effect.

When any resident of this state dies leaving a spouse or minor children, the court shall set over to the spouse, and if none to the minor children, as their absolute property, all property of the decedent exempt from execution under the exemption laws of this state including the homestead. Such property shall not be subject to the payment of debts of the decedent, except expenses of administration or funeral expenses of the decedent in cases in which there is not other property in the estate sufficient to pay the expenses. If [the] decedent does not have any or all of the property specified under the exemption laws, the spouse or minor children are entitled to the value of the exempt property either in money or other property as they may prefer. If the surviving spouse is not the parent of all or any minor children, one-half (1/2) of the property shall be set over to the surviving spouse and the other one-half (1/2) to the minors who are not children of the survivor. A conservator shall be appointed for the children as in any other cases of estate property descending to a minor. The right of a surviving spouse to any of the exempt property is not affected by his or her renouncing or failing to renounce the benefit of the provisions made for him or her in the will of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 28, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6879; R.S. 1931, § 88-2904; Laws 1943, ch. 8, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-1504; W.S. 1957, § 2-213; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-104

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to right of family survivors under the exemption laws, see §

1-20-103

.

As to rights of adopted minors and adults, see §

1-22-114

.

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

Constitutionality. —

Where it was contended that this entire section was void because language of the 1943 amendment commencing “Provided that” and ending “minor” conflicted with the first part of the section, the contention was held untenable since that language was the last expression of the legislative will and it would be given effect under the rule that, where particular provisions conflict with general provisions, the particular would govern. In re Edelman's Estate, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1951).

Where trial court overruled portion of demurrer (now motion to dismiss) predicated on violations by this section of art. 1, §§ 2, 3 and 34, and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const., it did not commit reversible error, since examples of violations suggested were hypothetical and it was not shown that rights of party filing demurrer (now motion to dismiss) were, or were about to be, adversely affected by operation of this section. In re Edelman's Estate, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1951).

Widow's nonresidency does not bar right to homestead exemption.—

See Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

The legislature without question changed the policy toward nonresidents as laid down in Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1902), by the enactment of this section, at least insofar as such policy was directed at the probate statutes. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

There can be little doubt that the statutory proviso, “a widow residing in this territory,” was of persuasive force in the decision reached in Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1902). However, such proviso is no longer found. It was eliminated by ch. 28, Laws 1919, and in its stead this section now provides in part that, “when any resident of this state dies leaving a widower or widow (now “spouse”) …,” he or she shall be entitled to receive substantially the same benefits conferred by the former statute. The shift of the residence requirement from the surviving spouse to the decedent is indeed significant. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

Evidence to establish marriage. —

Testimony of widow and certificate of minister who performed marriage were admissible in probate proceedings to set estate over to the widow. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Widow's testimony and certificate that deceased and widow were married was sufficient to justify setting over to widow the estate property. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Where widow's rights were not involved in heirship proceeding,

a motion to declare widow in default was properly overruled. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Children may appear to resist widow's claim. —

Under this section and §

2-7-505

, children of deceased husband may appear to resist widow's claim to homestead and other property. In re Kiesel's Estate, 35 Wyo. 300, 249 P. 81,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1926).

Section to be construed with exemption laws. —

Inasmuch as this section pertains to property of a decedent “exempt from execution under the exemption laws of this state,” it is necessary that it be construed along with the applicable exemption laws. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

It has been held not to contemplate homestead different fromthat under such laws. —

That this section does not contemplate a probate homestead different from the homestead contemplated under the exemption laws is apparent in two ways. First, it is not primarily a “homestead” as such which the statute authorizes to be set over; it is all property of the decedent “exempt from execution,” including the homestead. Second, the value of the homestead referred to in this section is not fixed in the Probate Code; it is fixed in the exemption laws by §

1-20-101

.Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962). But see §

2-7-508

.

Such laws looked to for property exempt or amount set overin lieu thereof. —

A probate judge necessarily turns to the exemption laws to find what, if any, property is to be set over pursuant to the provisions of this section and to find the value thereof when money or other property is set over in lieu of exempt property. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Section means not having specifically exempted property attime of death. —

In this section the phrase “in case decedent shall not have any or all of the property specified under said exemption laws” (now “If decedent does not have any or all of the property specified under the exemption laws”) was used. If the legislature had intended this phrase to mean in case decedent's estate shall not have any or all of the property specified, it should have used the words “decedent's estate” instead of the word “decedent.” However, by use of the word “decedent” the legislature made the phrase “in case decedent shall not have” applicable as of the time of death and not during the process of administration which follows death. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

And other property or cash may be selected in lieu thereof.—

Where it appears that an estate has no specific property such as is mentioned in the exemption statutes (§

1-20-101

et seq.), the person entitled, or the court, may select other property in lieu thereof, or cash, up to the amount allowed by law as exempt. In re Edelman's Estate, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1951).

Where land cannot be set apart as homestead. —

Ordinarily, where in the nature of things land cannot be set apart as a homestead to the survivors, then the law will make provision for them in lieu thereof. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Retention of contingent interest equal to value of homestead.—

See Burnell v. Roush, 404 P.2d 836,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1965).

Allowance of one-half of value of homestead to minors not entitledto homestead. —

Without deciding whether this section may be applied differently in the case of minor children who are not children of the surviving spouse, when no part of the homestead goes to them or can be set apart for them, there is sufficient authority in §§

2-7-501

,

2-7-502

and

2-7-503

, which have to do with rights of the family and extra allowances for the family, to justify and support the allowance to the minor children of one-half of the value of the homestead exemption, in the absence of a contest on that allowance. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Homestead right may be abandoned.

Goodson v. Smith, 69 Wyo. 439, 243 P.2d 163,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1952).

Cited

in

Dobler v. Clark, 42 Wyo. 160, 292 P. 246,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(1930); Campbell v. Prater, 64 Wyo. 293, 191 P.2d 160,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1948); Strom v. Felton, 76 Wyo. 370, 302 P.2d 917,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1956); Pangarova v. Nichols, 419 P.2d 688,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1966).

Law reviews. —

See “Disinheriting a Murderer of an Ancestor,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 132.

For note on homestead exemption in Wyoming, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 81 (1961).

See note, “Wambeke v. Hopkin — A New Lesson in Wyoming Property Rights,” 18 Wyo. L.J. 34 (1963).

See note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?” 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of surviving spouse and children in proceeds of sale of homestead in decedent's estate, 6 ALR2d 515.

Homestead exemption as extending to rentals derived from homestead property, 40 ALR2d 897.

Operation and effect of antenuptial agreements to waive or bar surviving spouse's right to probate homestead or surviving family's similar homestead right or exemption, 65 ALR2d 727.

Wife as head of family within homestead or other property exemption provision, 67 ALR2d 779.

Estate or interest in real property to which a homestead claim may attach, 74 ALR2d 1355.

Contractual waiver of after acquired homestead exemption, 82 ALR2d 982.

§ 2-7-505.
Procedure for setting off exempt property.

Any time during the administration of an estate and after the first publication of notice of opening the probate and the filing of the appraisement, any person interested may file a petition showing the necessary facts and praying to have the exempt property of the estate including the homestead set over to the person or persons entitled thereto. Upon filing of the petition, the court shall require all persons interested to appear on a day certain to show cause why the exempt property should not be set over to the person or persons entitled thereto. The order shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the probate is pending and a copy of the order to show cause shall be mailed by the personal representative to each heir and beneficiary. The publication and mailing shall be not less than ten (10) days prior to the date set for the hearing. At the time set for the hearing or to which the hearing is continued, the court shall hear the evidence and make such order as the facts and law require. If the whole estate of the decedent is found to be exempt and is set over to the person or persons entitled thereto, no further proceeding is required in the administration of the estate unless further estate is discovered. The publication and notice may be combined with and included in the notice of opening the probate, but the hearing shall not be held less than ten (10) days after the filing of the appraisement.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 28, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 6880; R.S. 1931, § 88-2905; Laws 1943, ch. 105, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 6-1505; W.S. 1957, § 2-214; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-105

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 28, Laws 1919, repealed §§ 5605, 5606, 5607, 5608, 5609 and 5610, Wyoming Compiled Statutes 1910.

Children may appear to resist widow's claim. —

Under this section and §

2-7-504

, children of deceased husband may appear to resist widow's claim to homestead and other property. In re Kiesel's Estate, 35 Wyo. 300, 249 P. 81,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1926).

Evidence to establish marriage. —

Testimony of widow and certificate of minister who performed marriage were admissible in probate proceedings to set estate over to the widow. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Widow's testimony and certificate that deceased and widow were married was sufficient to justify setting the estate property over to widow. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Where widow's rights were not involved in an heirship proceeding,

a motion to declare widow in default was properly overruled. In re St. Clair's Estate, 46 Wyo. 446, 28 P.2d 894,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1934).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Edelman, 68 Wyo. 30, 228 P.2d 408,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1951).

§ 2-7-506.
Homestead to be set apart by court; payment of liens or encumbrances.

If the homestead held prior to the death of the decedent is returned in the appraisement at a value not exceeding the value of the homestead exemption provided in W.S.

2-7-508

, the court shall order it set off to the persons entitled thereto. If there are liens or encumbrances on the homestead and if the funds of the estate are adequate to pay all claims against the estate, all claims against the estate and any liens or encumbrances on the homestead, whether filed or presented or not, if known or made known to the personal representative, shall be paid out of the funds. If the funds of the estate are not sufficient for that purpose, liens or encumbrances shall be paid proportionately with other claims allowed, and the liens or encumbrances on the homestead shall only be enforced against the homestead for any deficiency remaining after the payment.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4742; C.S. 1910, § 5611; Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 6881; R.S. 1931, § 88-3001; C.S. 1945, § 6-1506; Laws 1949, ch. 74, § 1; 1951, ch. 11, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 2-215; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-106

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to recordation of judgment or decree, see §

2-2-301

.

As to return of inventory and appraisement of estate, see §

2-7-403

et seq.

Lienholder need not present claim to representative. —

Where husband and wife executed mortgage before husband's death and wife thereafter claimed homestead, which was not divisible and worth over the statutory amount, mortgage holder was not required to present claim to widow as executrix. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Cited

in

Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

, 29 A.L.R. 1371 (1923).

§ 2-7-507.
Duty of appraisers to appraise and divide homestead.

If the homestead is returned in the appraisement at more than the value of the homestead exemption set forth in W.S.

2-7-508

, the appraisers shall determine whether the premises can be divided without material injury. If they can be divided, the appraisers shall admeasure and set apart to the parties entitled thereto the portion of the premises, including the dwelling house, as will amount in value to the homestead exemption and make report thereof giving the metes, bounds and full description of the portion set apart as a homestead. If the appraisers find that the premises exceed in value the homestead exemption and the premises cannot be divided without material injury, they shall report the finding, and thereafter the court may make an order for the sale of the premises and the distribution of the proceeds to the parties entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 4743; C.S. 1910, § 5612; Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 6882; R.S. 1931, § 88-3002; C.S. 1945, § 6-1507; Laws 1951, ch. 11, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 2-216; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-107

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Lienholder need not present claim to representative. —

Where husband and wife executed mortgage before husband's death and wife thereafter claimed homestead, which was not divisible and worth over the statutory amount, mortgage holder was not required to present claim to widow as executrix. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

§ 2-7-508.
Amount of homestead exemption.

Wheresoever in the Probate Code the limit of the homestead exemption is established or referred to, the exemption is thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00).

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 104, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 6883; R.S. 1931, § 88-3003; C.S. 1945, § 6-1508; Laws 1951, ch. 11, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 2-217; Laws 1975, ch. 60, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to amount of homestead under the exemption laws, see §

1-20-101

.

For other provisions relating to homestead exemption, see §

1-20-102

et seq.

Meaning of “Probate Code.” —

The term “Probate Code” refers to the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Editor's notes. —

Though this section was originally enacted as part of an act which amended various sections of the Probate Code, it should be noted that, prior to the 1980 revision of title 2, it was ostensibly applicable not only to probate matters but to any case in which a homestead exemption was involved in that it started out by stating “Wheresoever in the statutes …”; however, the 1980 revision substituted the language “Wheresoever in the Probate Code …” at the beginning of the section.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 10, ch. 104, Laws 1915, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Law reviews. —

See note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?” 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

§ 2-7-509.
Costs of proceedings; homestead exempt from claims against estate.

The costs of all proceedings provided for in W.S.

2-7-501

through

2-7-508

shall be paid by the estate as expenses of administration. Persons succeeding by purchase or otherwise to the interests, rights and title of successors to homesteads or to the right to have homesteads set apart to them, shall take the homestead exempt from claims against the estate of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 13, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 4746; C.S. 1910, § 5615; C.S. 1920, § 6886; R.S. 1931, § 88-3004; C.S. 1945, § 6-1509; W.S. 1957, § 2-218; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-109

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for administration expenses of spouse electing against will, 89 ALR3d 315.